Wyoming, session 2026, SF0063.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-3-103(a)(i) by creating a new
subparagraph (M) and (f) and 28-9-109(h)(intro) and (i) are
amended to read:

16-3-103. Adoption, amendment and repeal of rules;
notice; hearing; emergency rules; proceedings to contest;
review and approval by governor.

SF0063

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0106
(a) Prior to an agency's adoption, amendment or
repeal of all rules other than interpretative rules or
statements of general policy, the agency shall:

(i) Give at least forty-five (45) days notice of
its intended action. Notice shall be mailed to all persons
making timely requests of the agency for advanced notice of
its rulemaking proceedings and to the attorney general, the
secretary of state's office as registrar of rules, and the
legislative service office if a state agency. The agency
shall submit a copy of the proposed rules, in a format
conforming to any requirements prescribed pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section, with the notice given to
the legislative service office. The notice shall include:

(M) If the rules are major rules as defined
in W.S. 28-9-109(h), a statement that the rules are major
rules, a statement of need for the major rule and any
additional information necessary for the regulatory
analysis required by W.S. 28-9-109.

(f) The state registrar of rules shall:

SF0063

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0106
(i) Prescribe a format for state agencies to
follow in preparing proposed amendments to existing rules
which shall ensure that additions to and deletions from
existing language are clearly indicated;.

(ii) Adopt rules necessary to ensure that state
agencies provide information necessary for the regulatory
analysis required by W.S. 28-9-109 and as specified in
subparagraph (a)(i)(M) of this section.

28-9-109. Agency rules; analysis and review.

(h) "Major rule" means a rule, including an emergency
rule, designated by management council under W.S. 28-9-109
that will result in or is likely to result in one (1) or
more of the following:

(i) An annual impact on the economy of Wyoming
that will result in direct or indirect costs of not less
than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000.00) per year;

SF0063

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0106
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0063